Massachusetts, session 194th, H660.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1 of Chapter 69 of the General laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by striking out item (4) and inserting in place thereof the following words,
effective July 1, 2021:
“(4) to provide equity in opportunity for all children to reach their full potential, an
effective mechanism in the form of a computer-adaptive assessment with a high enough ceiling
and low enough floor to monitor the actual achievement and progress of individual students’
mastery through the various K-12 learning standards in English, Mathematics, Science and
Social Studies, which mechanism seeks to identify, on an annual basis, the learning standards
students likely have already mastered and those which they haven’t, for the purposes of
identifying all students’ authentic growth, ensuring their continuous progress through those
learning standards, identifying directly the actual level of each student’s learning readiness in the
public classrooms of the Commonwealth, and of holding educators more accurately and fairly
accountable through such authentic measure of students’ achievement and growth.”
of 2

Section 1I of Chapter 69 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by replacing the fourth sentence of the second paragraph with the following
sentence, effective July 1, 2023:
“To provide equity in opportunity for all children to reach their full potential, such
instruments shall be criterion-referenced and flexible enough to assess which levels of the
various academic standards, described in this chapter, that students are meeting.”
of 2